Utah statutes.
10-5-117.   Increasing budget total of fund.

Except for enterprise funds, which may be increased without a public hearing, the council may increase the budget total of one or more of these funds by following the procedures set forth in Section 10-5-108.



Amended by Chapter 181, 1986 General Session

